en: Cocoa oat-based drinks, Cocoa oat milks
fr: Boissons végétales d'avoine au cacao
sv: Chokladhavredrycker, Kakaohavredrycker, havredryck choklad

en: Vanilla oat-based drinks, Vanilla oat milks
fr: Boissons végétales d'avoine à la vanille

en: Oat-based barista drinks, Barista oat drinks, Barista oat milks
da: Barista-havredrikke
sv: Barista-havredrycker

en: Plain oat-based barista drinks, Plain barista oat drinks, Plain barista oat milks
sv: Naturelle barista-havredrycker

en: Flavoured oat-based barista drinks, Flavoured barista oat drinks, Flavoured barista oat milks
sv: Barista-havredrycker med smak

en: Quinoa-based drinks, Quinoa milks, Quinoa drinks
bg: Напитка с киноа
de: Quinoamilch, Quinoamilche, Quinoamilchen, Quinoa-Drinks, Quinoa-Drink, Quinoadrink, Quinoadrinks
es: Bebidas de quinoa, Leches de quinoa
fr: Boissons au quinoa, Boissons végétales de quinoa, Laits de quinoa
hr: Pića na bazi kvinoje
nl: Quinoamelken, Quinoadranken
pt: Bebidas de quinoa

en: Rice-based drinks, Rice milks, Rice drinks
bg: Напитка с ориз
ca: Beguda d'arròs
da: risdrikke, rismælk
de: Reismilch, Reismilche, Reismilchen, Reis-Drinks, Reis-Drink, Reisdrink, Reisdrinks
es: Bebidas de arroz, Leches de arroz
fi: riisijuomat
fr: Boissons au riz, Boissons végétales de riz, Laits de riz, lait de riz
he: משקאות אורז, חלב אורז
hr: Pića na bazi riže
hu: Rizstejek
it: Bevanda di riso
ja: ライスミルク
lt: Ryžių pienas
nl: Rijstdranken
pl: Mleka ryżowe
pt: Bebidas de arroz
sv: Risdryckor

en: Plain rice-based drinks, Natural rice milks, Natural rice drinks, Plain rice milks, Plain rice drinks
de: Natürliche Reismilch, Natürliche Reisgetränke, Einfache Reismilch, Einfache Reisgetränke
es: Bebidas de arroz naturales, Leches de arroz naturales
fr: Boissons végétales de riz nature, Laits de riz nature, Boissons à base de riz nature
hr: Obična pića na bazi riže
it: Latte di riso naturale
nl: Natuurlijke rijstdranken

en: Vanilla rice-based drinks, Vanilla rice milks, Vanilla rice drinks
es: Bebidas de arroz con vainilla, Leches de arroz con vainilla
fr: Boissons végétales de riz à la vanille, Laits de riz à la vanille
hr: Pića na bazi riže vanilije
nl: Vanillerijstdranken
pt: Bebidas de arroz com baunilha

en: Cocoa rice-based drinks, Cocoa rice milks, Chocolate rice milks, Cocoa rice drinks, Chocolate rice drinks
es: Bebidas de arroz con cacao, Bebidas de arroz con chocolate, Leches de arroz con cacao, Leches de arroz con chocolate
fr: Boissons végétales de riz au cacao, Boissons végétales de riz au chocolat, Laits de riz au cacao, Laits de riz au chocolat
hr: Pića na bazi riže i kakaa
nl: Chocoladerijstdranken
pt: Bebidas de arroz com cacau

en: Sesame-based drinks, Sesame milks, Sesame drinks
de: Sesammilch, Sesammilche, Sesammilchen, Sesam-Drinks, Sesam-Drink, Sesamdrink, Sesamdrinks
es: Bebidas de sésamo, Leches de sésamo
fr: Boissons végétales de sésame, Laits de sésame
hr: Pića na bazi sezama
lt: Sezamų pienas
nl: Sesamzaaddranken

en: Basil seeds drinks
de: Basilikumsamen-Getränke
es: Bebidas de semillas de albahaca
fr: Boissons aux graines de basilic
hr: Pića od sjemenki bosiljka
nl: Basilicumzaaddranken
pt: Bebidas de sementes de manjericão

en: Teff-based drinks, Teff milks, Teff drinks
de: Zwerghirsemilch, Zwerghirsemilche, Zwerghirsemilchen, Zwerghirse-Drinks, Zwerghirse-Drink, Zwerghirsedrink, Zwerghirsedrinks
es: Bebidas de teff, Leches de teff
fr: Boissons végétales de teff, Laits de teff
hr: Pića na bazi tefa
nl: Teffdranken

en: Wheat-based drinks, Wheat milks, Wheat drinks
de: Weizenmilch, Weizenmilche, Weizenmilchen, Weizen-Drinks, Weizen-Drink, Weizendrink, Weizendrinks
es: Bebidas de trigo, Leches de trigo
fi: Viljajuomat, Viljamaidot
fr: Boissons végétales de blé, Laits de blé
hr: Pića na bazi pšenice
it: Latti di grano
lt: Kviečių pienas
nl: Tarwedranken
pt: Bebidas de trigo

en: Khorasan wheat-based drinks, Khorasan wheat milks, Kamut milks, Khorasan wheat drinks, Kamut drinks
de: Khorasan-Weizen-Milch, Khorasan-Weizen-Milche, Khorasan-Weizen-Milchen, Khorasan-Weizen-Drinks, Khorasan-Weizen-Drink, Kamutmilch, Kamutmilche, Kamutmilchen, Kamut-Drinks, Kamut-Drink, Kamutdrink, Kamutdrinks
es: Bebidas de trigo de Jorasán, Leches de trigo de Jorasán, Leches de Kamut, Bebidas de Kamut
fr: Boissons végétales de blé khorasan, Boissons végétales de blé de Khorasan, Boissons végétales de Kamut, Laits de blé de Khorasan, Laits de Kamut
hr: Khorasan pića na bazi pšenice
nl: Kamutdranken

en: Spelt-based drinks, Spelt milks, Spelt drinks
de: Dinkelmilch, Dinkelmilche, Dinkelmilchen, Dinkel-Drinks, Dinkel-Drink, Dinkeldrink, Dinkeldrinks
es: Bebidas de espelta, Leches de espelta
fi: Spelttijuomat, Spelttimaidot
fr: Boissons végétales d'épeautre, Laits d’épeautre, Laits d’Épeautre, Boissons à l'épeautre, Boissons d'épeautre
hr: Pića na bazi pira
it: Bevanda di farro
nl: Speltdranken
pt: Bebidas de espelta

en: Potato-based drinks, Potato milks
da: Kartoffeldrikke, Kartoffelbaserede drikke
sv: Potatisdryckor, Potatisbaserade dryckor

en: Barista potato drinks, Barista potato milks
da: Barista-kartoffeldrikke
sv: Barista-potatisdryckor

en: Coconut-based drinks, Coconut drinks, Coconut-based drink plain prepacked
bg: Кокосово мляко
ca: Beguda de coco
de: Kokos-Drinks, Kokos-Drink, Kokosdrink, Kokosdrinks, Kokosnuss-Drinks, Kokosnuss-Drink, Kokosnussdrink, Kokosnussdrinks
es: Bebidas de coco
fi: kookosjuomat
fr: Boissons végétales de coco, Boisson à la noix de coco nature préemballée
he: חלב קוקוס, חלבי קוקוס, משקאות קוקוס, קרם קוקוס
hr: Pića na bazi kokosa
hu: Kókusz tej
ja: ココナッツミルク, ココナツミルク
lt: Kokosų pienas
nl: Kokosmelken, Kokosnootmelken
pl: Mleka kokosowe
pt: Bebidas de coco
ru: Кокосовое молоко

en: Hemp-based drinks, Hemp milks, Hemp seed milks
de: Hanfmilch, Hanfmilche, Hanfmilchen, Hanf-Drinks, Hanf-Drink, Hanfdrink, Hanfdrinks
es: Bebidas de cáñamo, Leches de cáñamo
fr: Boissons végétales de chanvre, Laits de chanvre
hr: Pića na bazi konoplje
nl: Hennepdranken